Maryland, session 2025, SB0643.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–218.
(A) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER PROVISION OF LAW, AND SUBJECT TO
SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEMS THAT PRODUCE
ENERGY FROM NATURAL GAS MAY BE CONSTRUCTED, PERMITTED, AND OPERATED
IN THE STATE.
(B) A PERSON CONSTRUCTING AN ENERGY GENERATING SYSTEM UNDER
THIS SECTION SHALL COMPLY WITH THE PROVISIONS OF THIS SUBTITLE RELATING
TO REQUIREMENTS TO OBTAIN:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0643*

SENATE BILL 643
(1) A CERTIFICATE OF PUBLIC CONVENIENCE AND NECESSITY; OR
(2) COMMISSION APPROVAL FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF THE
GENERATING SYSTEM.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:
(1) the General Assembly supports the development of additional nuclear
energy in the State, including small modular reactors and the combination of nuclear
energy and energy produced from natural gas, for reliable clean energy in the State; and
(2) the General Assembly encourages PJM Interconnection, LLC to provide
an expedited interconnection process for new thermal generation resources in the State.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.